New York, session 2025-2026, S6179.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The mental hygiene law is amended by adding a new section 2 7.50 to read as follows: 3 § 7.50 Victims of sexual offenses; outpatient group setting. 4 The office shall develop guidelines regarding victims of sexual 5 offenses receiving services in an outpatient group setting. Such guide- 6 lines shall outline best practices providers may use when providing 7 services to victims of sexual abuse in an effort to avert retraumatiza- 8 tion by known sex offenders. Such best practices shall, to the greatest 9 extent possible, be based on evidence based practices. In creating such 10 guidelines, the office shall consult with stakeholders. Such stakehold- 11 ers shall include, but not be limited to, representatives of consumer 12 advocates, providers and victim rights groups. 13 § 2. The mental hygiene law is amended by adding a new section 19.44 14 to read as follows: 15 § 19.44 Victims of sexual offenses; outpatient group setting. 16 The office shall develop guidelines regarding victims of sexual 17 offenses receiving services in an outpatient group setting. Such guide- 18 lines shall outline best practices providers may use when providing 19 services to victims of sexual abuse in an effort to avert retraumatiza- 20 tion by known sex offenders. Such best practices shall, to the greatest 21 extent possible, be based on evidence based practices. In creating such 22 guidelines, the office shall consult with stakeholders. Such stakehold- 23 ers shall include, but not be limited to, representatives of consumer 24 advocates, providers and victim rights groups. 25 § 3. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD10659-01-5